Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.550

Investigation of complaints of violations concerning nursing technicians.

The department shall investigate complaints of violations of RCW 18.79.350 and 18.79.360 by an employer. The department shall maintain records of all employers that have violated RCW 18.79.350 and 18.79.360.

[ 2003 c 258 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2003 c 258: See notes following RCW 18.79.330.